Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-406.01
Organ and tissue donation; commission; distribute brochure; permit application; request status as donor; change; procedure; commission powers and duties; anatomical gift; when effective.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2023, when a Nebraska resident at least sixteen years of age applies for an annual hunting permit or annual fishing permit, the commission shall distribute a brochure provided by an organ and tissue procurement organization approved by the Department of Health and Human Services containing a description and explanation of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act to each person applying for a permit who has not previously provided a response under subsection (2) of this section. If the application for a permit is made through the Internet, a link to an electronic copy of the brochure shall be provided.

(2) The application for an annual hunting permit or annual fishing permit shall contain the following question: Do you wish to include your name in the Donor Registry of Nebraska and donate your organs and tissues at the time of your death? The commission shall record such response in an electronic database if the permit applicant is at least sixteen years of age and indicates on the application whether he or she wishes to be an organ and tissue donor. Submitting an application indicating that the permit applicant wishes to be a donor shall constitute an authorization under subsection (b) of section 71-4828.

(3) A person may change his or her status as a donor by (a) Internet access to the Donor Registry of Nebraska, (b) telephone request to the registry, or (c) other methods approved by the federally designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska. The commission shall provide information on its website on how a person may change such person's donor status.

(4) The commission shall electronically transfer to the federally designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska the first and last name, date of birth, gender, address, city, state, zip code, email address if provided, date of registration, and the unique user identification number of each person who agreed to make an anatomical gift under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) An anatomical gift made through the process described in subsection (2) of this section shall be considered made at the time the application is submitted regardless of when the information described in subsection (4) of this section is transferred.

(6) No person shall obtain information about an applicant's response as described in subsection (2) of this section except to facilitate the donation process. General statistical information may be provided upon request to the federally designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska.

(7) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Laws 2022, LB1082, § 2.

Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see section 71-4824.